en: Squeegee blade design: Round; Straight; Other
nl: Ontwerp wisserblad: Rond; Steil; Andere
hr-HR: Dizajn gume brisača: Okrugli; Ravni; Ostalo
pt-PT: Design da lâmina de rodo: Redondo; Liso; Outro
nb: Skrapebladdesign: Rund; Rett; Annet
pl: Konstrukcja ostrza ściągaczki: Runda; Prosta; Inne
fr: Conception de la lame de raclette: Rond; Lisses; Autre
sl-SI: Oblika brisalca stekla: Zaobljea; Ravna; Drugo
fi: Vetolastan terän muotoilu: Pyöreä; Suorat; Muu
lt-LT: Grandiklio ašmenų dizainas: Apvalus; Tiesus; Kita
tr: Silecek bıçağı tasarımı: Yuvarlak; Düz; Diğer
hu: Ablaktörlőlapát kialakítása: Kerek; Egyenes; Egyéb
es: Diseño de hoja de escobilla de goma: Redondo; Liso; Otros
zh-CN: 刮刀设计: 圆头; 直; 其他
ru: Конструкция лезвия ракеля: Круглый; Прямой; Другое
cs: Konstrukce stěrky: Oválná; Rovné; Jiné
el: Σχέδιο λεπίδας μάκτρου: Στρογγυλό; Ευθεία; Άλλο
de: Design der Abziehlippe: Rund; Glatt; Sonstiges
da: Design af gummiskraberblad: Rund; Lige; Andet
it: Design della lama del lavavetri: Rotondo; Dritto; Altro
ko: 스퀴지 블레이드 디자인: 라운드; 일자형; 기타
sk-SK: Dizajn čepele stierky: Okrúhly; Rovný; Iné
th: การออกแบบใบมีดยางปาดสี: ทรงกลม; ผมตรง; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 刮刀刀片設計: 圓頭; 直; 其他
sv: Skrapbladsdesign: Rund; Rakt; Övrigt
ja: スクイジーのブレードの種類: ラウンド; ストレート; その他
ro-RO: Design lamă racletă: Rotundă; Dreaptă; Altele
bg-BG: Дизайн на острието на чистачката: Кръгла; Права; Други
vi: Thiết kế lưỡi gạt: Mũi giày tròn; Tóc thẳng; Khác
pt-BR: Formato do raspador do rodo: Redondo; Liso; Outro